Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-24,112
Disposition of unclaimed assets.

Disposition of unclaimed assets, fees, legacies, devises, and distributive shares shall be subject to the provisions of sections 25-2714 to 25-2717.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 190.